apertium-ido.ido.dix
    <pardef n="num_regex">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)*</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ciph"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="num_ord_regex">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+\-?ma</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ma__ord">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esma</l>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__invar_verb">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="np__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__prep_art">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e><par n="num_regex"/></e>
    <e><par n="num_ord_regex"/></e>
    <e lm="adan"><i>adan</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="adche"><i>adche</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="aden"><i>aden</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="adsub"><i>adsub</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="adsur"><i>adsur</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="alfa"><i>alfa</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="alonge"><i>alonge</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ambe … ed"><i>ambe … ed</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="anavan"><i>anavan</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ansub"><i>ansub</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ansur"><i>ansur</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="antielektrono"><i>antielektrono</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="apen"><i>apen</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="apud"><i>apud</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="artrito"><i>artrito</i><par n="__det"/></e>
    <e lm="autodafe"><i>autodafe</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="avan"><i>avan</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="avelanea"><i>avelanea</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="baba"><i>baba</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="berenjenea"><i>berenjenea</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="blogo"><i>blogo</i><par n="__det"/></e>
    <e lm="bloguro"><i>bloguro</i><par n="__det"/></e>
    <e lm="cerizea"><i>cerizea</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="chao"><i>chao</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ci"><i>ci</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="cinamea"><i>cinamea</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cirkum"><i>cirkum</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="da"><i>da</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dal"><i>dal</i><par n="__prep_art"/></e>
    <e lm="dedop"><i>dedop</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="del"><i>del</i><par n="__prep_art"/></e>
    <e lm="delta"><i>delta</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="desub"><i>desub</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="di"><i>di</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="di qua"><i>di qua</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="dil"><i>dil</i><par n="__prep_art"/></e>
    <e lm="diversekoloroza"><i>diversekoloroza</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="do"><i>do</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="dum"><i>dum</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="e"><i>e</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ed"><i>ed</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="Edipus"><i>Edipus</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="el"><i>el</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="elta"><i>elta</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="elu"><i>elu</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="en"><i>en</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="eta"><i>eta</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="faktotum"><i>faktotum</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ferea"><i>ferea</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="flamo"><i>flamo</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="folietono"><i>folietono</i><par n="__det"/></e>
    <e lm="for"><i>for</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="furtechasado"><i>furtechasado</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="geisha"><i>geisha</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="haustorium"><i>haustorium</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hepatea"><i>hepatea</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hidalgo"><i>hidalgo</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hozanna"><i>hozanna</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ica"><i>ica</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ico"><i>ico</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ilca"><i>ilca</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ili"><i>ili</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ilta"><i>ilta</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ilu"><i>ilu</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="inter"><i>inter</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="interjeciono"><i>interjeciono</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="irgequanta"><i>irgequanta</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="irgi"><i>irgi</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="irgu"><i>irgu</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ito"><i>ito</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ja ke"><i>ja ke</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kad"><i>kad</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="kam"><i>kam</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ke"><i>ke</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="khan"><i>khan</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="klaraviolea"><i>klaraviolea</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kontre"><i>kontre</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="krucedispozita"><i>krucedispozita</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kudo"><i>kudo</i><par n="__det"/></e>
    <e lm="kun"><i>kun</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="la"><i>la</i><par n="__det"/></e>
    <e lm="landau"><i>landau</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="lo"><i>lo</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="lui"><i>lui</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ma"><i>ma</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="mackintosh"><i>mackintosh</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="maletraktanta"><i>maletraktanta</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="malgre"><i>malgre</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="malgre ke"><i>malgre ke</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="maxim"><i>maxim</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="merkovorto"><i>merkovorto</i><par n="__det"/></e>
    <e lm="mintea"><i>mintea</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nam"><i>nam</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="nek"><i>nek</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="nek … nek"><i>nek … nek</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ni"><i>ni</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="no"><i>no</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="nulo"><i>nulo</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nun"><i>nun</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="o"><i>o</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="o … o"><i>o … o</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="od"><i>od</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ol"><i>ol</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="oli"><i>oli</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="olqua"><i>olqua</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="olqui"><i>olqui</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="olu"><i>olu</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="on"><i>on</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="or"><i>or</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="oranjea"><i>oranjea</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="papa"><i>papa</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="perlomatrea"><i>perlomatrea</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pokesinua"><i>pokesinua</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="por ke"><i>por ke</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="postpoziciono"><i>postpoziciono</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="pri"><i>pri</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pro ke"><i>pro ke</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="publicisto"><i>publicisto</i><par n="__det"/></e>
    <e lm="quan"><i>quan</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="quankam"><i>quankam</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="quarko"><i>quarko</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="quazemarmora"><i>quazemarmora</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="quon"><i>quon</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="quoniam"><i>quoniam</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="recensar"><i>recensar</i><par n="__det"/></e>
    <e lm="redaktar"><i>redaktar</i><par n="__det"/></e>
    <e lm="reumatismo"><i>reumatismo</i><par n="__det"/></e>
    <e lm="revuo"><i>revuo</i><par n="__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ribea"><i>ribea</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rozea"><i>rozea</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rubriko"><i>rubriko</i><par n="__det"/></e>
    <e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="sen"><i>sen</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="sha"><i>sha</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="sive"><i>sive</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="sive … sive"><i>sive … sive</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="sol"><i>sol</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="sucinea"><i>sucinea</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sur"><i>sur</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="syncytium"><i>syncytium</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="tamen"><i>tamen</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="to"><i>to</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="trans"><i>trans</i><par n="__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tro"><i>tro</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="turco"><i>turco</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ulo"><i>ulo</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vel"><i>vel</i><par n="__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ventresternanta"><i>ventresternanta</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="Vu"><i>Vu</i><par n="__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="xi"><i>xi</i><par n="__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="yes"><i>yes</i><par n="__adv"/></e>
